csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTI_Ind_am.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0Pl: niwaabandanziinaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0Sg: niwaabandanziinaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0Pl: giwaabandanziinaawaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0Sg: giwaabandanziinaawaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0Pl: giwaabandanziinaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0Sg: giwaabandanziinaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0Pl: owaabandanziinaawaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg: owaabandanziinaawaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: owaabandanziininaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: owaabandanziininaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0Pl: owaabandanziinaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg: owaabandanziinaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+0Pl: niwaabandanziiminaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+0Sg: niwaabandanziiminaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+0Pl: giwaabandanziiminaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+0Sg: giwaabandanziiminaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0Pl: niwaabandaanaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0Sg: niwaabandaanaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0Pl: giwaabandaanaawaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0Sg: giwaabandaanaawaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0Pl: giwaabandaanaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0Sg: giwaabandaanaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0Pl: owaabandaanaawaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg: owaabandaanaawaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: [owaabandaminaadogenan,owaabandaaninaadogenan]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: [owaabandaminaadog,owaabandaaninaadog]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0Pl: owaabandaanaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg: owaabandaanaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+0Pl: niwaabandaaminaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+0Sg: niwaabandaaminaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+0Pl: giwaabandaaminaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+0Sg: giwaabandaaminaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+X+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+X+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+X+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+X+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0Pl: niwaabandanziinan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niwaabandanziin
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0Pl: giwaabandanziinaawaan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0Sg: giwaabandanziinaawaa
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0Pl: giwaabandanziinan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0Sg: giwaabandanziin
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0Pl: owaabandanziinaawaan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg: owaabandanziinaawaa
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: [owaabandanziinini,owaabandanziini]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: [owaabandanziinini,owaabandanziini]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0Pl: owaabandanziinan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg: owaabandanziin
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+0Pl: niwaabandanziimin
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+0Sg: niwaabandanziimin
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+0Pl: giwaabandanziimin
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+0Sg: giwaabandanziimin
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Pl: niwaabandaanan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niwaabandaan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0Pl: giwaabandaanaawaan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0Sg: giwaabandaanaawaa
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Pl: giwaabandaanan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Sg: giwaabandaan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0Pl: owaabandaanaawaan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg: owaabandaanaawaa
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: [owaabandamini,owaabandaanini]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: [owaabandamini,owaabandaanini]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0Pl: owaabandaanan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg: owaabandaan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+0Pl: niwaabandaamin
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+0Sg: niwaabandaamin
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+0Pl: giwaabandaamin
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+0Sg: giwaabandaamin
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0Pl: [niwaabandanziinaabaniin,niwaabandanziinaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0Sg: niwaabandanziinaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0Pl: [giwaabandanziinaawaabaniin,giwaabandanziinaawaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0Sg: giwaabandanziinaawaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0Pl: [giwaabandanziinaabaniin,giwaabandanziinaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0Sg: giwaabandanziinaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0Pl: [owaabandanziinaawaabaniin,owaabandanziinaawaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg: owaabandanziinaawaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: [owaabandanziininaabaniin,owaabandanziininaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: owaabandanziininaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0Pl: [owaabandanziinaabaniin,owaabandanziinaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg: owaabandanziinaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+0Pl: [niwaabandanziiminaabaniin,niwaabandanziiminaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+0Sg: niwaabandanziiminaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+0Pl: [giwaabandanziiminaabaniin,giwaabandanziiminaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+0Sg: giwaabandanziiminaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0Pl: [niwaabandaanaabaniin,niwaabandaanaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0Sg: niwaabandaanaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0Pl: [giwaabandaanaawaabaniin,giwaabandaanaawaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0Sg: giwaabandaanaawaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0Pl: [giwaabandaanaabaniin,giwaabandaanaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0Sg: giwaabandaanaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0Pl: [owaabandaanaawaabaniin,owaabandaanaawaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg: owaabandaanaawaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: [owaabandaaninaabaniin,owaabandaaninaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: owaabandaaninaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0Pl: [owaabandaanaabaniin,owaabandaanaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg: owaabandaanaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+0Pl: [niwaabandaaminaabaniin,niwaabandaaminaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+0Sg: niwaabandaaminaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+0Pl: [giwaabandaaminaabaniin,giwaabandaaminaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+0Sg: giwaabandaaminaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+0Sg: MISSING
